Mississippi, session 2026, HB1.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 9-5-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-13.  (1)  There shall be three (3) chancellors for the Third Chancery Court District. (2)  (a)  The chancellor of Subdistrict 3-1 shall be elected from DeSoto County.  The two (2) chancellors of Subdistrict 3-2 shall be elected from Grenada County, Montgomery County, Panola County, Tate County and Yalobusha County. (b)  For purposes of appointment and election, the three (3) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct.  The chancellorship in Subdistrict 3-1 shall be denominated only as "Place One," and the chancellorships in Subdistrict 3-2 shall be denominated only as "Place Two" and "Place Three." [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-13.  (1)  There shall be * * *two (2) three (3) chancellors for the Third Chancery Court District. (2)  For purposes of appointment and election only, the * * *two (2) three (3) chancellorships shall be separate and distinct and denominated as "Place One" * * *and, "Place Two * * *." and "Place Three". The chancellor of Place One must reside in Tate County, Panola County or Yalobusha County.  The chancellor of Place Two must reside in Carroll County, Grenada County, Montgomery County or Tallahatchie County.  The chancellor of Place Three must reside in Carroll County, Grenada County, Montgomery County, Panola County, Tallahatchie County, Tate County or Yalobusha County. SECTION 2.  If this act is approved by the Governor or becomes law without the Governor's signature by January 23, 2026, any candidate for the office of chancellor for Place Three of the Third Chancery Court District in Section 1 of this act that takes office from and after January 1, 2027, shall file their intent to be a candidate no later than February 2, 2026, and qualify as otherwise provided in Section 23-15-977 for candidates for judicial office; however, if this act has not been approved by the Governor or does not become law without the Governor's signature by January 23, 2026, any candidate for the office of chancellor for Place Three of the Third Chancery Court District in Section 1 of this act that takes office from and after January 1, 2027, shall file their intent to be a candidate no later than 5:00 p.m. on May 1, 2026, and qualify as otherwise provided in Section 23-15-977 for candidates for judicial office. Regardless of which qualifying deadline applies, any candidate for the office of chancellor for Place Three of the Third Chancery Court District in Section 1 of this act that begins from and after January 1, 2027, shall run for such office in the November 2026 general election for judicial officers in the same manner as all other candidates for judicial office. SECTION 3.  Section 23-15-977, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-977.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided * * *in this section by law, all candidates for judicial office as defined in Section 23-15-975 of this subarticle shall file their intent to be a candidate with the proper officials and pay the proper assessment by not later than 5:00 p.m. on February 1 of the year in which the general election for the judicial office is held.  If February 1 occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, candidates shall file their intent to be a candidate and pay the proper assessment by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday.  Candidates shall pay to the proper officials the following amounts: (a)  Candidates for Supreme Court justice and Court of Appeals judge, the sum of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00). (b)  Candidates for circuit judge and chancellor, the sum of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). (c)  Candidates for county judge and family court judge, the sum of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). (d)  Candidates for justice court judge, the sum of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). Candidates for judicial office may not file their intent to be a candidate and pay the proper assessment before January 1 of the year in which the election for the judicial office is held. (2)  Candidates for judicial offices listed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1) of this section shall file their intent to be a candidate with, and pay the proper assessment made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to, the State Board of Election Commissioners. (3)  Candidates for judicial offices listed in paragraphs (c) and (d) of subsection (1) of this section shall file their intent to be a candidate with, and pay the proper assessment made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to, the circuit clerk of the proper county.  The circuit clerk shall notify the county election commissioners of all persons who have filed their intent to be a candidate with, and paid the proper assessment to, such clerk.  The notification shall occur within two (2) business days and shall contain all necessary information. (4)  If only one (1) person files his or her intent to be a candidate for a judicial office and that person later dies, resigns or is otherwise disqualified from holding the judicial office after the deadline provided for in subsection (1) of this section but more than seventy (70) days before the date of the general election, the Governor, upon notification of the death, resignation or disqualification of the person, shall issue a proclamation authorizing candidates to file their intent to be a candidate for that judicial office for a period of not less than seven (7) nor more than ten (10) days from the date of the proclamation. (5)  If only one (1) person qualifies as a candidate for a judicial office and that person later dies, resigns or is otherwise disqualified from holding the judicial office within seventy (70) days before the date of the general election, the judicial office shall be considered vacant for the new term and the vacancy shall be filled as provided in by law. SECTION 4.  Section 9-5-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-11.  (1)  The Third Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  DeSoto County; (b)  Grenada County; (c)  Montgomery County; (d)  Panola County; (e)  Tate County; and (f)  Yalobusha County. (2)  The Third Chancery Court District shall be divided into two (2) subdistricts as follows: (a)  Subdistrict 3-1 shall consist of DeSoto County. (b)  Subdistrict 3-2 shall consist of Grenada County, Montgomery County, Panola County, Tate County and Yalobusha County. [From and after January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-11.  The Third Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  Carroll County; (b)  Grenada County; (c)  Montgomery County; (d)  Panola County; (e)  Tallahatchie County; (f)  Tate County; and (g)  Yalobusha County. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.